errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON OKTALOHKI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#lohki%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GUOKTE
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:i%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:e%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:e»X4%- # ; !guovtte- ja njealje- ja guđajagat
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e»X4# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! guovttegielat 
 +Num+Sg+Loc:i%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:i%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:i%>X5jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON GUOKTENUPPELOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#nuppe#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#nuppe#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;     ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e%>#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X4t#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GUOKTEGOALMMATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#goalmmát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X4t#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GUOKTENJEALJATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#njealját#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#njealját#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#njealját#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e%>#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X4t#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#njealját#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
guok0te#nuppe#lohkái:guok't GUOKTENUPPELOHKAI ;
guok0te#goalmmát#lohkái:guok't GUOKTEGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
guok0te#njealját#lohkái:guok't GUOKTENJEALJATLOHKAI ;
njeallje#nuppe#lohkái:njeallj GUOKTENUPPELOHKAI ;
njeallje#goalmmát#lohkái:njeallj GUOKTEGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
njeallje#njealját#lohkái:njeallj GUOKTENJEALJATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
guok0te#nuppe#lohkái:guok't GUOKTENUPPELOHKAI ;
guok0te#goalmmát#lohkái:guok't GUOKTEGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
guok0te#njealját#lohkái:guok't GUOKTENJEALJATLOHKAI ;
njeallje#nuppe#lohkái:njeallj GUOKTENUPPELOHKAI ;
njeallje#goalmmát#lohkái:njeallj GUOKTEGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
njeallje#njealját#lohkái:njeallj GUOKTENJEALJATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON num-imprecise
moadde#nuppe#lohkái:moadd GUOKTENUPPELOHKAI ;
galle#nuppe#lohkái:gall GUOKTENUPPELOHKAI ;
moadde:moadd GUOKTE ;
gal0le:gal'l GUOKTE ;
